Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [462.3575] LIMITING REGULATIONS ON RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT. new text end new text begin (a) A municipality must not require a planned unit development agreement in lieu of a proposed residential development if the proposed residential development complies with existing city zoning ordinances or subdivision regulations, or qualifies as a conditional use. new text end new text begin (b) A planned unit development agreement must be made available to the public by posting the agreement on the website of the municipality at least seven days prior to the governing body's review of the agreement. If the municipality does not have a website, a copy of the planned unit development agreement must be available for review at the city hall building of the municipality. new text end new text begin (c) If a planned unit development agreement is approved by the municipality, the agreement cannot be modified unless all parties to the agreement concur. new text end